Nevada, session 83, AB391.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 385A.200 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385A.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS
385A.070 must include information on pupil achievement and
school performance, including, without limitation, pupil
achievement for each school in the district and the district as a
whole, including, without limitation, each charter school sponsored
by the district. The board of trustees of the district shall base its
report on the results of the examinations administered pursuant to
NRS 390.105 and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610 and shall compare the results
of those examinations for the school year for which the annual
report is being prepared with those of previous school years. The
report must include, for each school in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district, and
each grade in which the examinations and assessments were
administered:
(a) The number of pupils who took the examinations and a
record of attendance for the period in which the examinations were
administered, including an explanation of any difference in the
number of pupils who took the examinations and the number of
pupils who are enrolled in the school.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.070, pupil achievement, reported separately by gender and
reported separately for the groups of pupils identified in the
statewide system of accountability for public schools.
(c) A comparison of the achievement of pupils in each group
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools with the performance targets established for that group.
(d) The percentage of pupils who were not tested.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.070, the percentage of pupils who were not tested, reported
separately by gender and reported separately for the groups
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
(f) The most recent 3-year trend in pupil achievement in each
subject area tested and each grade level tested pursuant to NRS
390.105 and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610, which may include
information regarding the trend in the achievement of pupils for
more than 3 years, if such information is available.
-
*AB391_R1*

– 3 –
(g) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.070, information on pupil achievement among pupils with
more than 10 absences occurring before the earlier of the first day
of the period prescribed by the State Board during which any
examination must be administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 at the
school of the pupil or, if the pupil is enrolled in high school, the
first day of the period during which the college and career
readiness assessment must be administered in all public high
schools as prescribed by the State Board pursuant to NRS 390.610,
reported separately for the groups identified in the statewide
system of accountability for public schools. For the purposes of
this paragraph, a pupil is absent if the pupil misses an entire
school day, including any scheduled partial school day, regardless
of whether the absence is excused.
(h) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of NRS
385A.720, the rating of each public school in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district,
pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
[(h)] (i) Information on whether each school in the district,
including, without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the
district, has made progress based upon the model adopted by the
Department pursuant to NRS 390.125.
[(i)] (j) Information that compares the results of pupils in the
school district, including, without limitation, pupils enrolled in
charter schools sponsored by the district, with the results of pupils
throughout this State. The information required by this paragraph
must be provided in consultation with the Department to ensure the
accuracy of the comparison.
[(j)] (k) For each school in the district, including, without
limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district, information
that compares the results of pupils in the school with the results of
pupils throughout the school district and throughout this State. The
information required by this paragraph must be provided in
consultation with the Department to ensure the accuracy of the
comparison.
2. If the Department temporarily waives or otherwise pauses
the requirement to administer examinations that comply with 20
U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2) pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS 390.105, the
requirement of subsection 1 to include certain information in the
annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS 385A.070
does not apply for the period of time that such a waiver or pause is
effective.
-
*AB391_R1*

– 4 –
Sec. 2. NRS 385A.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.410 Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 of
NRS 390.105, the annual report of accountability prepared by the
State Board pursuant to NRS 385A.400 must include information on
pupil achievement and school performance, including, without
limitation:
1. Information on the achievement of all pupils based upon the
results of the examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105
and the college and career readiness assessment administered
pursuant to NRS 390.610, reported for each school district,
including, without limitation, each charter school in the district, and
for this State as a whole.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.400, pupil achievement, reported separately by gender and
reported separately for the groups of pupils identified in the
statewide system of accountability for public schools.
3. A comparison of the achievement of pupils in each group
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools with the performance targets established for that group.
4. The percentage of all pupils who were not tested, reported
for each school district, including, without limitation, each charter
school in the district, and for this State as a whole.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.400, the percentage of pupils who were not tested, reported
separately by gender and reported separately for the groups
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
6. The most recent 3-year trend in the achievement of pupils in
each subject area tested and each grade level tested pursuant to NRS
390.105 and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610, reported for each school
district, including, without limitation, each charter school in the
district, and for this State as a whole, which may include
information regarding the trend in the achievement of pupils for
more than 3 years, if such information is available.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.400, information on pupil achievement among pupils with
more than 10 absences occurring before the earlier of the first day
of the period prescribed by the State Board during which any
examination must be administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 at the
school of the pupil or, if the pupil is enrolled in high school, the
first day of the period during which the college and career
readiness assessment must be administered in all public high
schools as prescribed by the State Board pursuant to NRS 390.610,
reported separately for the groups identified in the statewide
-
*AB391_R1*

– 5 –
system of accountability for public schools. For the purposes of
this subsection, a pupil is absent if the pupil misses an entire
school day, including any scheduled partial school day, regardless
of whether the absence is excused.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of NRS
385A.720, the rating of each public school, including, without
limitation, each charter school, pursuant to the statewide system of
accountability for public schools.
[8.] 9. Information on whether each public school, including,
without limitation, each charter school, has made progress based
upon the model adopted by the Department pursuant to NRS
390.125, if applicable for the grade level of pupils enrolled at the
school.
[9.] 10. Information on the results of pupils who participated in
the examinations of the National Assessment of Educational
Progress required pursuant to NRS 390.830.
Sec. 3. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB391_R1*